Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 161.067 is amended to read:
161.067. (1)(a) When the  same conduct or criminal episode violates two or more statutory pro-
visions and each provision requires proof of an element that the others do not, there  are as many
separately punishable offenses as there are separate statutory violations.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 132.586, 163.160 and 163.190 and paragraph (a) of this subsection,
a pleading, admission or finding that  criminal conduct constitutes a crime involving domestic
violence, as defined in ORS 135.230, is not an element for purposes of this section.
(2) When the same conduct or criminal episode, though violating only one statutory provision
involves two or more victims, there are as many separately punishable  offenses as there are victims.
However, two or more persons owning joint interests in real or personal  property shall be consid-
ered a single victim for purposes of determining the number  of separately punishable offenses if the
property is the subject of one of the following crimes:
(a) Theft as defined in ORS 164.015.
(b) Unauthorized use of a vehicle as defined in ORS 164.135.
(c) Criminal possession of rented or leased personal property as defined in ORS 164.140.
(d) Criminal possession of a rented or leased motor vehicle as defined in ORS 164.138.
(e) Burglary as defined in ORS 164.215 or 164.225.
(f) Criminal trespass as defined in ORS 164.243, 164.245, 164.255, 164.265 or 164.278.
(g) Arson and related offenses as defined in ORS 164.315, 164.325 or 164.335.
(h) Forgery and related offenses as defined in ORS 165.002 to 165.070.
(3) When the same conduct or criminal  episode violates only one statutory provision and in-
volves only one victim, but nevertheless involves repeated violations  of the same statutory provision
against the same victim, there are as many  separately punishable offenses as there are violations,
except that each violation, to be separately punishable under this  subsection, must be separated
from other such violations by a sufficient pause in the defendant’s  criminal conduct to afford the
defendant an opportunity to  renounce the criminal intent. Each method of engaging in oral or anal
sexual intercourse as defined in ORS 163.305, and each method of engaging in  unlawful sexual pen-
Enrolled House Bill 2975 (HB 2975-A) Page 1
etration as defined in  ORS 163.408 and 163.411 shall constitute separate violations of their respec-
tive statutory provisions for purposes of determining the number of statutory violations.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 161.067 by section 1 of this 2025  Act apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2975 (HB 2975-A) Page 2